Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code
45A.225.
Definitions and applicability.

For purposes of KRS

45A.225

to

45A.290

, court means the court of this Commonwealth which would have original jurisdiction over the action if it were between private citizens of this Commonwealth; and in the event of an appeal from such a court, the court which would have jurisdiction over such an appeal if the action were between private citizens of this Commonwealth.

KRS

45A.225

to

45A.290

apply only to each contract solicited or entered into after January 1, 1979.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 45, effective January 1, 1979.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/19/2004). 2004 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 2, provides, “Notwithstanding
KRS

18A.225

,

45A.022

,

45A.080

,

45A.085

,

45A.090

,

45A.225

to

45A.290

, or any other provision of KRS Chapter 45A to the contrary, retroactive to August 12, 2004, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall implement the provisions of this Act by amending the previously negotiated contracts for public employee health insurance. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide an actuarial certification that the self-insured contract amounts are actuarially sound. Any contracts entered into or modified pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the Legislative Research Commission.”

45A.230.
Authority of secretary to settle claims.

Prior to the institution of any action in a court concerning any contract, claim, or controversy, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized, subject to any limitations or conditions imposed by regulations, to settle, compromise, pay, or otherwise adjust the claim by or against, or controversy with, a contractor relating to a contract entered into by the Finance and Administration Cabinet on behalf of the Commonwealth or any state agency, including a claim or controversy based on breach of contract, mistake, misrepresentation, or other cause for contract modification or rescission, but excluding any claim or controversy involving penalties or forfeitures prescribed by statute or regulation where an official other than the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is specifically authorized to settle or determine such controversy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 46, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.235.
Action on contract claims or controversies.

This section shall apply to a claim or controversy arising under contracts between the Commonwealth and its contractors. If such a claim or controversy is not resolved by mutual agreement, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his designee, shall promptly issue a decision in writing. A copy of that decision shall be mailed or otherwise furnished to the contractor. The decision shall be final and conclusive unless fraudulent, or unless the contractor sues pursuant to KRS

45A.245

. If the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet does not issue a written decision within one hundred and twenty (120) days after written request for a final decision, or within such longer period as might be established by the parties to the contract in writing, then the contractor may proceed as if an adverse decision had been received.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 47, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.240.
Definitions for terms used in KRS 45A.225 to 45A.290.

As used in KRS

45A.225

to

45A.290

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky and any of its departments or agencies.

“Contracting agency” means any department or agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky having entered into a lawfully authorized written contract.

History.

Amend. and reenacted Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 48, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.245.
Action on contract — Damages.

Any person, firm or corporation, having a lawfully authorized written contract with the Commonwealth at the time of or after June 21, 1974, may bring an action against the Commonwealth on the contract, including but not limited to actions either for breach of contracts or for enforcement of contracts or for both. Any such action shall be brought in the Franklin Circuit Court and shall be tried by the court sitting without a jury. All defenses in law or equity, except the defense of governmental immunity, shall be preserved to the Commonwealth.

If damages awarded on any contract claim under this section exceed the original amount of the contract, such excess shall be limited to an amount which is equal to the amount of the original contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 180, § 2, in part; 1974, ch. 181, § 2; 1976, ch. 297, § 1; repealed and reenact., Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 49, effective January 1, 1979.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Acts 1966, ch. 180, § 2, in part; 1974, ch. 181, § 2; 1976, ch. 297, § 1) was formerly compiled as KRS

44.270

and was repealed and reenacted as this section by Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 49, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.250.
Findings of court.

The court shall enter its findings as a judgment of the court, and such judgment shall have the same effect and be enforceable as any other judgment of the court in civil cases subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.270

.

History.

Amend. and reenacted 1978, ch. 110, § 50, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.255.
Appeals from Circuit Court.

Appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals from Franklin Circuit Court under the same conditions and under the same practice as appeals are taken from judgments in civil causes rendered by Circuit Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 180, § 4; 1974, ch. 181, § 4; repealed and reenact., Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 51, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.260.
Limitations on claims.

Any claim arising from a construction contract executed and administered by the Transportation Cabinet pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177 and 180 shall be commenced in Franklin Circuit Court within one (1) year from the time the Commonwealth has determined final pay quantities and issues a final pay estimate to the contracting party, notifying him of its final determination, or from the receipt of a final adverse decision from the Commonwealth, whichever occurs later.

Any other claim shall be commenced in Franklin Circuit Court within one (1) year from the date of completion specified in the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 180, § 6; 1974, ch. 181, § 5; repealed and reenact., Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 52, effective January 1, 1979; 1984, ch. 354, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

45A.265.
One recovery only.

No person, firm, or corporation shall be permitted more than one (1) money recovery upon a claim for the enforcement of or for breach of contract with the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 180, § 5; repealed and reenact., Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 53, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.270.
Presentation of judgment for payment — Appropriations.

Each agency which has had an award or judgment against it upon a claim filed pursuant to KRS

45A.240

to

45A.270

shall furnish a certified copy of the award of judgment to the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of any award or judgment against the Department of Highways, Transportation Cabinet, shall be paid out of the state road fund, upon warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the State Treasurer. The first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of any award or judgment against other departments or agencies of the state, which are not maintained by appropriations out of the general fund, shall be paid out of the funds created or collected for the maintenance and operation of such department or agency, upon warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the State Treasurer. The first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of any award or judgment against all other departments and agencies of the state shall be paid out of the general fund, upon warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the State Treasurer.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall request an appropriation from the next even-numbered-year regular session of the General Assembly for the purpose of satisfying all such awards and judgments granted during the preceding two (2) fiscal years which are not satisfied under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Amend. and reenacted 1978, ch. 110, § 54, effective January 1, 1979; 2001, ch. 58, § 11, effective June 21, 2001.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 180, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 181, § 6) was formerly compiled as KRS

44.330

and was amended and reenacted as this section by Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 54, effective January 1, 1979.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 30, (2) at 1653.

45A.275.
Judgments against Commonwealth up to $500,000 deemed necessary governmental expense.

The first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of any Kentucky court judgment against the Commonwealth awarding damages on a contract claim under the provisions of KRS

45A.240

to

45A.270

shall be a necessary governmental expense and payment shall be approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and paid by the State Treasurer. Appropriations for these judgments shall be continued appropriations.

History.

Amend. and reenacted 1978, ch. 110, § 55, effective January 1, 1979.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Acts 1974, ch. 181, § 7) was formerly compiled as KRS

44.340

and was amended and reenacted as this section by Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 55, effective January 1, 1979.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 30, (1) at 1653.

45A.280.
Presumption of correctness.

The decision of any official, board, agent, or other person appointed by the Commonwealth concerning any controversy arising under, or in connection with, the solicitation or award of a contract, shall be entitled to a presumption of correctness and shall not be disturbed unless the decision was procured by fraud or the findings of fact by such official, board, agent or other person do not support the decision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 56, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.285.
Filing of protest — Decision by secretary.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his designee, shall have authority to determine protests and other controversies of actual or prospective bidders or offerors in connection with the solicitation or selection for award of a contract.

Any actual or prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with the solicitation or selection for award of a contract may file a protest with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. A protest or notice of other controversy must be filed promptly and in any event within two (2) calendar weeks after such aggrieved person knows or should have known of the facts giving rise thereto. All protests or notices of other controversies must be in writing.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promptly issue a decision in writing. A copy of that decision shall be mailed or otherwise furnished to the aggrieved party and shall state the reasons for the action taken.

The decision by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be final and conclusive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 57, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.290.
Effect of protest.

In the event of a protest timely filed under KRS 45A.285(2), the Commonwealth shall not proceed further with the solicitation or award involved, until the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his designee, makes a written and adequately supported determination that continuation of the procurement is necessary to protect substantial interests of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 58, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.295.
Definitions for terms used in KRS 45A.295 to 45A.320.

As used in KRS

45A.295

to

45A.320

:

“State public purchasing unit” shall mean the Finance and Administration Cabinet and any other purchasing agency of this Commonwealth.

“Local public purchasing unit” shall mean any county, city, governmental entity and other subdivision of the Commonwealth or public agency thereof, public authority, public educational, health, or other institution, any other entity which expends public funds for the acquisition or leasing of supplies, services, and construction, and any nonprofit corporation operating a charitable hospital.

“Public purchasing unit” shall mean either a local public purchasing unit or a state public purchasing unit.

“Foreign purchasing activity” shall mean any buying organization not located in this Commonwealth which, if located in this Commonwealth, would qualify as a public purchasing unit. An agency of the United States government is a foreign purchasing activity.

“Cooperative purchasing” shall mean purchasing conducted by, or on behalf of, more than one (1) public purchasing unit, or by a public purchasing unit with a foreign purchasing activity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 59, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.300.
Cooperative purchasing.

Any public purchasing unit may either participate in, sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the acquisition of any supplies, services, or construction with any other public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity, in accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants. This cooperative purchasing may include, but is not limited to, joint contracts between public purchasing units and access by local public purchasing units to open-ended state public purchasing unit contracts.

Nothing in this code shall limit any public purchasing unit from selling to, acquiring from, or using any property belonging to another public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity independent of the requirements of KRS

45A.070

to

45A.180

.

Nothing in this code shall limit or restrict any public purchasing unit from entering into an agreement, independent of the requirements of KRS 45A.045(5) and KRS

45A.070

to

45A.165

, with any other public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity for the cooperative use of supplies or services.

Any public purchasing unit may enter into an agreement for the joint or common use of warehousing facilities or the lease or common use of capital equipment or facilities with any other public purchasing unit or a foreign purchasing activity subject to the terms as may be agreed upon between the parties.

Nothing in this code shall limit or restrict the ability of local school districts to acquire supplies outside of the public purchasing agreements when the supplies and equipment meeting the same specifications as the contract items are available at a lower price elsewhere and the purchase does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Nothing in this code shall limit any public purchasing unit from receiving notice of or accepting a price reduction on supplies or equipment when the supplies or equipment are being offered by the vendor with whom a price agreement has been made; the supplies or equipment are being offered in accordance with all terms and conditions that are specified in the price agreement, except those relating to price; and the price reduction is offered to all of the participants in the price agreement. Public purchasing units may accept special price reductions under this subsection even if the reduced price requires the purchase of a specified quantity of units different from the quantity stated in the original price agreement. Price reductions under this subsection shall not be considered to permanently alter the price of the supplies or equipment under the price agreement with the Commonwealth, except where the price reductions are to be made permanent under the express terms of the price agreement and where the purchasing agency which solicited the price agreement determines that the enforcement of those terms serves the best interest of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 60, effective January 1, 1980; 1990, ch. 496, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 89, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 31, effective May 30, 1997; 2003, ch. 98, § 21, effective June 24, 2003.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Based on the provisions of the Model Procurement Code, the Bureau (now Department) for the Blind may proceed with its plans for the bureau of rehabilitation services (BRS) to purchase short-term evaluation and adjustment services from the Bureau (now Department) for the Blind for disabled individuals eligible under the BRS program, even though such individuals may not be blind or visually impaired.

OAG 82-293

.

The intent of the General Assembly was to provide for the maximum cooperation between state agencies in order to facilitate the achievement of the purposes for which these agencies were created.

OAG 82-293

.

45A.305.
Personnel, information, and technical services — Schedule of fees.

Any public purchasing unit is authorized, within its discretion, upon written request from another public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity, to provide personnel to the requesting public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity. Payment to the public purchasing unit providing the personnel, by the public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity making the request, of direct and indirect costs of furnishing the personnel, and the terms relating thereto shall be agreed upon by the parties involved.

The informational, technical, and other services of any public purchasing unit may be made available to any other public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity provided that the requirements of the public purchasing unit tendering the services shall have precedence over the requesting public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity. Additionally, and subject to agreement between the parties, the requesting public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity shall pay all of the expenses of the services so provided.

This Commonwealth, through the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon request may make available to all public purchasing units the following services, among others:

Standard forms;

Printed manuals;

Product specifications and standards;

Quality assurance testing services and methods;

Qualified products lists;

Source information;

Common use commodities listings;

Supplier prequalification information;

Supplier performance ratings;

Debarred and suspended bidders list;

Forms for invitations for bids, requests for proposals, instructions to bidders, general contract provisions, and other contract forms; and

Contracts or published summaries thereof, including price and time of delivery information.

The Commonwealth, through the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may provide the following technical services, among others:

Development of products specifications;

Development of quality assurance test methods, including receiving, inspection, and acceptance procedures;

Use of state product testing and inspection facilities; and

Use of state personnel training programs.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may publish a schedule of fees for the services provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 61, effective January 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 32, effective July 15, 1982.

45A.310.
Use of payments — Compliance with code requirements — Review of procurement requirements.

All payments received by a supplying public purchasing unit from any other public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity shall be available or appropriated to the supplying public purchasing unit to defray the cost of the services provided.

Where the public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity administering a cooperative purchase complies with the requirements of this code, any public purchasing unit participating in such a purchase shall be deemed to have complied with this code.

Where the public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity administering a cooperative purchase does not follow this code, then the purchasing officer of a state public purchasing unit must determine, in writing, that he has examined the procurement system of the public purchasing unit or foreign purchasing activity administering the purchase, and has found that the proposed method of purchase substantially meets the requirements of this code.

The Department for Local Government shall collect information concerning the type, cost, quality, and quantity of commonly used supplies, services, or construction being procured or used by state public purchasing units. The Department for Local Government may also collect this information from local public purchasing units. The Department for Local Government may make available all such information to any public purchasing unit upon request.

Nothing in KRS

45A.295

to

45A.320

shall be deemed to require a local public purchasing unit to comply with any other provision of KRS Chapter 45A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 62, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 6, effective April 9, 1980; 1998, ch. 69, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 30, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 36, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.315.
Resolution of disputes.

Any local public purchasing unit is authorized to enter into an agreement with any other local public purchasing unit to establish a procedure to resolve disputes arising from the contracts of the participating local public purchasing units.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 63, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.320.
Effect of federal grants upon public purchasing units.

If federal grant or other federal requirements differ from the provisions of this code or regulations adopted hereunder, nothing in this code or its regulations shall inhibit any public purchasing unit from complying with the terms and conditions of the federal grant or other federal requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 64, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.325.
Collusion to restrain bids prohibited.

Any agreement or collusion among bidders or prospective bidders which restrains, tends to restrain, or is reasonably calculated to restrain competition by agreement to bid at a fixed price, or to refrain from bidding, or otherwise, is prohibited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 178, § 1; 1966, ch. 126, § 1; repealed and reenact., Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 65, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.328.
Prohibition of contract — Conditions.

No contract shall be awarded, extended, or renewed to a bidder or contractor under this chapter if the bidder or contractor procured an original, subsequent, or similar contract while employing an executive agency lobbyist who was convicted of a crime related to the original, subsequent, or similar contract within five (5) years of the conviction of the lobbyist.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 150, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

2022 Ky. Acts ch. 150, sec. 5, provides that KRS

45A.328

, as created in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 150, sec. 3, shall be retroactively applied to all contracts entered into since January 1, 2017, and that no contract existing as of July 14, 2022, shall be voided under this statute.

45A.330.
Purpose of KRS 45A.330 to 45A.340.

The purpose of KRS

45A.330

to

45A.340

is to prescribe specific standards to guide public officers and employees in the conduct of their offices or employment, and to proscribe improper conduct to the extent to which such conduct may be sufficiently described to enable statutory prohibitions against it to be properly enforced. It is at the same time recognized that under a free government it is both necessary and desirable that all citizens should have certain specific interests in the decisions of government, and that the activities and conduct of public officers and employees should not be unduly circumscribed.

History.

Amend. and reenacted 1978, ch. 110, § 66, effective January 1, 1979.

45A.335.
Definitions for terms used in KRS 45A.330 to 45A.340.

As used in KRS

45A.330

to

45A.340

except as may be otherwise indicated by the context:

“Agency” means any of the departments of the state government, and any division, board, bureau, commission or other instrumentality within such department and any independent state authority, commission, instrumentality or agency, but it does not include a school district or other political subdivision nor an authority, commission, instrumentality or agency created pursuant to compact or agreement between or among the state of Kentucky and another state or states;

“Officer or employee” means a member of the boards of trustees, or regents of a state university, except faculty and student members, and a person holding an office, position or employment in an agency, but it does not include other persons who serve without salary and it does not include members or employees of school boards or district boards of education or faculty or staff of state institutions of higher learning or, as used in KRS 45A.340(5), citizen members of boards, commissions or independent state authorities who may receive per diem allowances for attendance at meetings of the boards, commissions or authorities on which they serve;

“Compensation” means any money, thing of value, or financial benefit conferred in return for services rendered or to be rendered, but it does not include the salary or other payment provided by law or appropriation for services rendered in a public office, position or employment.

History.

Repealed and reenacted Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 67, effective January 1, 1979; 1978, ch. 392, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 250, § 7, effective April 9, 1980; 1982, ch. 282, § 3, effective April 2, 1982.

45A.340.
Conflicts of interest of public officers and employees.

No officer or employee of the General Assembly, or officer or employee of an agency as defined in KRS

45A.335

, shall knowingly receive or agree to receive, directly or indirectly, compensation for any services to be rendered, either by himself or another, in negotiations with the state or an agency for the purchase by the state or an agency of an interest in real property. This section shall not apply to appearances before any court, except that negotiations shall be prohibited as aforesaid at any time.

No officer or employee of an agency or member of a state board or commission, may be in any manner interested, either directly or indirectly, in his own name or in the name of any other person, association, trust, or corporation, in any contract for the performance of any work in the making or letting or administration of which such officer or employee may be called upon to act or vote. No such officer or employee may represent, either as agent or otherwise, any person, association, trust, or corporation, with respect to any application or bid for any contract or work in regard to which such officer or employee may be called upon to act or vote. Nor may any such officer or employee take, solicit, or receive, either directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value as a gift or bribe or means of influencing his vote or action in his official character. Any contract made and procured in violation hereof is void. For the purposes of this section the holding of less than five percent (5%) of the stock of a corporation is not considered an interest.

No officer or employee of the General Assembly or officer or employee of any agency shall, for compensation, appear before an agency as an expert witness.

No officer or employee of the General Assembly, or officer or employee of any agency, shall act as officer or agent for the Commonwealth or any agency in the transaction of any business with himself, or with any corporation, company, association, or firm in which he or his spouse has any interest greater than five percent (5%) of the total value thereof.

No officer or employee of an agency or appointee shall knowingly himself or by his partners or through any corporation which he controls or in which he owns or controls more than ten percent (10%) of the stock, or by any other person for his use or benefit or on his account, undertake, execute, hold, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract, agreement, sale, or purchase of the value of twenty-five dollars ($25) or more, made, entered into, awarded or granted by any agency, unless said contract, agreement, sale or purchase:

Was made or let after public notice and competitive bidding; or

Results from the sale of a craft item to a state park if the employee is an interim state park employee designated as a craftsperson under KRS

148.257

.

No officer, employee, or appointee of an agency, including persons who serve without salary or other payment for their services, shall knowingly receive or agree to receive, directly or indirectly, compensation for any services rendered or to be rendered, either by himself or another, in any cause, proceeding, application, or other matter which is before said agency or before the department of state government in which said agency functions.

No member of a board of trustees or regents shall have an interest in any contract with a state university unless such contract shall have been subjected to competitive bidding in compliance with KRS Chapter 45A, unless such trustee or regent shall have been the lowest bidder and unless such trustee or regent shall have first notified in writing the remaining members of the board, and to the newspaper having the largest circulation in the county in which the state university is located, of his intention to bid on such contract.

No officer, employee, or appointee of an agency, including persons who serve without salary or other payment for their services, may participate in the procurement of a contract under this chapter that relates to his or her prior employment until at least one (1) year has passed since his or her termination with that employer.

HISTORY:

Amend. and reenacted Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 68, effective January 1, 1979; 1990, ch. 496, § 29, effective July 13, 1990; 2006, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2022 ch. 150, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

45A.343.
Local public agency may adopt provisions of KRS 45A.345 to 45A.460 — Effect of adoption — Contracts required to mandate revealing of violations of and compliance with specified KRS chapters — Effect of nondisclosure or noncompliance.

Any local public agency may adopt the provisions of KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

. No other statutes governing purchasing shall apply to a local public agency upon adoption of these provisions.

After July 15, 1994, any contract entered into by a local public agency, whether under KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

or any other authority, shall require the contractor and all subcontractors performing work under the contract to:

Reveal any final determination of a violation by the contractor or subcontractor within the previous five (5) year period pursuant to KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 that apply to the contractor or subcontractor; and

Be in continuous compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 that apply to the contractor or subcontractor for the duration of the contract.

A contractor’s failure to reveal a final determination of a violation by the contractor of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 or to comply with these statutes for the duration of the contract shall be grounds for the local public agency’s:

Cancellation of the contract; and

Disqualification of the contractor from eligibility for future contracts awarded by the local public agency for a period of two (2) years.

A subcontractor’s failure to reveal a final determination of a violation by the subcontractor of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 or to comply with these statutes for the duration of the contract shall be grounds for the local public agency’s disqualification of the subcontractor from eligibility for future contracts for a period of two (2) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 250, § 9, effective April 9, 1980; 1994, ch. 491, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 520, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.